Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
PAYMENT BY TAX LEVY ON PETITION OF ELECTORS

31-21-401. Power to levy - manner paid.

On the petition of a majority of the registered electors of any city or town having an outstanding bonded indebtedness amounting to one-fourth or more of its valuation for assessment, the governing body of such city or town is authorized to levy or cause to be levied at one time a tax on all the taxable property subject to taxes for payment of such bonds sufficient to discharge the entire principal of and the accrued interest on such indebtedness plus fifteen percent for delinquencies, which tax may be paid by the property owners at one time or in installments, as provided in this part 4. In determining the amount of outstanding bonded indebtedness, any sum in the sinking fund may be deducted.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1142, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 332, § 96, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-401 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-402. Discharge of lien by property owner.

Any property owner may discharge the lien of said bond tax on his property by paying the tax in full, in bonds or matured coupons of the issue for which the levy is made at their face value. Thereafter the same property shall not be liable for the payment of such tax as between the city or town and the property owner.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1142, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-402 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-403. Payment in installments.

Any property owner not paying the tax in full at one time has the privilege of paying the same in cash installments, the number of which installments shall be determined by the governing body and which shall equal the number of years from the time the next tax is payable to the last maturity of the bonds, with interest on the unpaid installments at the same rate which the outstanding bonds bear. After any property owner has paid one or more cash installments, he may pay the balance of said tax with bonds or matured coupons as provided in section 31-21-402.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1142, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-403 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-404. Payment in bonds - warrant for excess.

The tax-collecting officers are authorized to accept full payment of such taxes in said bonds or coupons and to cancel said bonds and coupons on such payment. Said tax-collecting officers are authorized to deliver to the person paying such tax a certificate, in duplicate, showing such payment and a description of the property on which the tax was paid, which certificate may be filed or recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein the property is situated.

In the event that any bonds or coupons presented as payment exceed the amount due, the tax-collecting officers shall deliver to the property owner a certificate to that effect, whereupon the property owner shall be entitled to receive from the city or town a warrant on its treasury, payable out of the bond and interest fund, in the amount of such excess, which warrant until paid shall bear the same rate of interest as the bonds for the payment of which the tax was levied.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1143, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-404 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-405. Assessment and collection.

Said taxes shall be certified, levied, assessed, and collected in the same manner and shall be subject to the same penalties as general taxes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1143, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-405 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-406. Suit by bondholder - city or town to protect.

In the event that any action, suit, or proceeding is brought by any bondholder, creditor, or other person, wherein it is sought to compel the levy of any further bond tax on property which has been discharged from said tax by payment in full, the city or town shall take all necessary steps to protect said property on which the tax has been paid in full by purchasing property sold for the nonpayment of such tax in the event that there are no other purchasers and by making ample provisions for the payment of delinquent bond taxes or the installments thereof out of the general fund or any other available fund, the intention being that, as between the city or town and the taxpayer, any particular property may be fully discharged and relieved from the lien of such tax or the levy of any further tax for the same purpose by payment in full of its proportionate share thereof at the time of payment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1143, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-406 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-407. Other laws unaffected.

Nothing in this part 4 shall prevent the issuance of any bonds or the levy of taxes for the payment thereof in the manner as is authorized by law nor shall anything in this part 4 prevent the issuance of bonds for the purpose of refunding any outstanding bonded indebtedness of any city or town in accordance with the provisions of law applying thereto.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1143, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-407 as it existed prior to 1975.